static/hunspell/28.01.2024/bash.aff
FLAG num
SFX 328 ҡ ғыусы . +Act+Clt/сы
SFX 328 ҡ ғыуҙыҡы/135 . +Act+Poss
SFX 328 ҡ ғыуҡай/139 . +Act+Dim
SFX 328 ҡ ғыуҙай/141 . +Act+Der/дай
SFX 328 ҡ ғыуса/143 . +Act+Der/са
SFX 328 ҡ ғыуҙағы/145 . +Act+Der/дағы
SFX 328 ҡ ғыулы/147 . +Act+Der/лы
SFX 328 ҡ ғыуһыҙ/151 . +Act+Abe
SFX 328 ҡ ғыуғаса/155 . +Act+Der/ҡаса
SFX 328 ҡ ғырмын/283 . +Fut+PxSg1
SFX 328 0 мам/283 . +Fut+PxSg1+Neg
SFX 328 0 маҫмын/283 . +Fut+PxSg1+Neg
SFX 328 ҡ ғырһың/283 . +Fut+PxSg2
SFX 328 0 маҫһың/283 . +Fut+PxSg2+Neg
SFX 328 ҡ ғыр/287 . +Fut+PxSg3
SFX 328 ҡ ғырҙар/115 . +Prc+Pl
SFX 328 ҡ ғырҙың/117 . +Prc+Gen
SFX 328 ҡ ғырға/121 . +Prc+Dat
SFX 328 ҡ ғырғараҡ . +Prc+Dat+Comp
SFX 328 ҡ ғырҙы/121 . +Prc+Acc
SFX 328 ҡ ғырҙан/117 . +Prc+Abl
SFX 328 ҡ ғырҙа/121 . +Prc+Loc
SFX 328 ҡ ғырҙараҡ . +Prc+Loc+Comp
SFX 328 ҡ ғырмын/126 . +Prc+Pred1Sg
SFX 328 ҡ ғырһың/126 . +Prc+Pred2Sg
SFX 328 ҡ ғырбыҙ/130 . +Prc+Pred1Pl
SFX 328 ҡ ғырһығыҙ/130 . +Prc+Pred2Pl
SFX 328 ҡ ғыр/195 . +Prc
SFX 328 ҡ ғырмы . +Prc+Q
SFX 328 ҡ ғырмылыр . +Prc+Q+Indf
SFX 328 ҡ ғырҙыр . +Prc+Indf
SFX 328 ҡ ғырсы . +Prc+Clt/сы
SFX 328 ҡ ғырҙыҡы/135 . +Prc+Poss
SFX 328 ҡ ғырҡай/139 . +Prc+Dim
SFX 328 ҡ ғырҙай/141 . +Prc+Der/дай
SFX 328 ҡ ғырса/143 . +Prc+Der/са
SFX 328 ҡ ғырҙағы/145 . +Prc+Der/дағы
SFX 328 ҡ ғырлы/147 . +Prc+Der/лы
SFX 328 ҡ ғырһыҙ/151 . +Prc+Abe
SFX 328 ҡ ғырғаса/155 . +Prc+Der/ҡаса
SFX 328 ҡ ғырыраҡ . +Prc+Comp
SFX 328 0 маҫ/293 . +Fut+PxSg3+Neg
SFX 328 0 маҫтар/115 . +Prc+Pl
SFX 328 0 маҫтың/117 . +Prc+Gen
SFX 328 0 маҫҡа/121 . +Prc+Dat
SFX 328 0 маҫҡараҡ . +Prc+Dat+Comp
SFX 328 0 маҫты/121 . +Prc+Acc
SFX 328 0 маҫтан/117 . +Prc+Abl
SFX 328 0 маҫта/121 . +Prc+Loc
SFX 328 0 маҫтараҡ . +Prc+Loc+Comp
SFX 328 0 маҫмын/126 . +Prc+Pred1Sg
SFX 328 0 маҫһың/126 . +Prc+Pred2Sg
SFX 328 0 маҫбыҙ/130 . +Prc+Pred1Pl
SFX 328 0 маҫһығыҙ/130 . +Prc+Pred2Pl
SFX 328 0 маҫ/205 . +Prc
SFX 328 0 маҫмы . +Prc+Q
SFX 328 0 маҫмылыр . +Prc+Q+Indf
SFX 328 0 маҫтыр . +Prc+Indf
SFX 328 0 маҫсы . +Prc+Clt/сы
SFX 328 0 маҫтыҡы/135 . +Prc+Poss
SFX 328 0 маҫҡай/139 . +Prc+Dim
SFX 328 0 маҫтай/141 . +Prc+Der/дай
SFX 328 0 маҫса/143 . +Prc+Der/са
SFX 328 0 маҫтағы/145 . +Prc+Der/дағы
SFX 328 0 маҫлы/147 . +Prc+Der/лы
SFX 328 0 маҫһыҙ/151 . +Prc+Abe
SFX 328 0 маҫҡаса/155 . +Prc+Der/ҡаса
SFX 328 0 маҫыраҡ . +Prc+Comp
SFX 328 ҡ ғырбыҙ/283 . +Fut+PxPl1
SFX 328 0 мабыҙ/283 . +Fut+PxPl1+Neg
SFX 328 0 маҫбыҙ/283 . +Fut+PxPl1+Neg
SFX 328 ҡ ғырһығыҙ/283 . +Fut+PxPl2
SFX 328 0 маҫһығыҙ/283 . +Fut+PxPl2+Neg
SFX 328 ҡ ғырҙар/287 . +Fut+PxPl3
SFX 328 0 маҫтар/287 . +Fut+PxPl3+Neg
SFX 328 0 ҡы/300 . +Opt2
SFX 328 0 ҡым/296 . +Opt2+PxSg1
SFX 328 0 ҡың/296 . +Opt2+PxSg2
SFX 328 0 ҡыһы/300 . +Opt2+PxSg3
SFX 328 0 ҡыбыҙ/296 . +Opt2+PxPl1
SFX 328 0 ҡығыҙ/296 . +Opt2+PxPl2
SFX 328 0 ҡылары/300 . +Opt2+PxPl3
SFX 328 ҡ ғаһы/300 . +GerFut3
SFX 328 ҡ ғаһыраҡ . +GerFut3+Comp
SFX 328 ҡ ғаһым/296 . +GerFut3+PxSg1
SFX 328 ҡ ғаһыбыҙ/296 . +GerFut3+PxPl1
SFX 328 ҡ ғаһылары/300 . +GerFut3+PxPl3
SFX 328 0 маҡсымын/304 . +FutPlan+PxSg1
SFX 328 0 маҡсыһың/304 . +FutPlan+PxSg2
SFX 328 0 маҡсы/308 . +FutPlan+PxSg3
SFX 328 0 маҡсыбыҙ/304 . +FutPlan+PxPl1
SFX 328 0 маҡсыһығыҙ/304 . +FutPlan+PxPl2
SFX 328 0 маҡсылар/306 . +FutPlan+PxPl3
SFX 328 0 ып/313 [^пкҡ] +GerPerf
SFX 328 0 ыбыраҡ [^пкҡ] +GerPerf+Comp
SFX 328 п бып/313 п +GerPerf
SFX 328 п быбыраҡ п +GerPerf+Comp
SFX 328 к гып/313 к +GerPerf
SFX 328 к гыбыраҡ к +GerPerf+Comp
SFX 328 ҡ ғып/313 ҡ +GerPerf
SFX 328 ҡ ғыбыраҡ ҡ +GerPerf+Comp
SFX 328 0 майынса/311 . +GerPerf
SFX 328 0 майынсараҡ . +GerPerf+Comp
SFX 328 0 майса/311 . +GerPerf
SFX 328 0 майсараҡ . +GerPerf+Comp
SFX 328 0 ҡансы/311 . +GerPerf
SFX 328 0 ҡансыраҡ . +GerPerf+Comp
SFX 328 ҡ ғырға/317 . +Inf
SFX 328 0 маҫҡа/317 . +Inf+Neg
